Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1970.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "driver's license" in section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *123456789101112131415161718 "Data field." A discrete piece of information that is printed or otherwise appears on a product.* * *"Driver's license." A license or permit, including a physical driver's license or electronic driver's license, issued by the department under this title to drive a motor vehicle [issued under this title].* * *"Electronic driver's license." An electronic representation of a physical driver's license that is viewable on an electronic product device. An electronic driver's license shall be considered the same as a physical driver's license issued by the department, except as follows:(1) Under section 1511 (relating to carrying and exhibiting driver's license on demand).(2) Under the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code.(2) UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED UNDER FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION."Electronic identification card." An electronic representation of a physical identification card that is viewable on an electronic product device. An electronic identification card shall be considered the same as a physical identification card driver's license issued by the department, except as follows : (1) Under section 1511. (2) Under the Pennsylvania Election Code. UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED UNDER FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION."Electronic product." An electronic extension of the department-issued physical product that conveys identity and 20250HB1970PN3053 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 driving privilege information and is in compliance with the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators Mobile Driver's License Implementations Guidelines, the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard and any other driver's license implementation standards approved by the department and published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. COMPLIES WITH NATIONAL AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND PUBLISHED IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN."Electronic product device." A computer, tablet, smart phone or other electronic personal device used by an electronic product holder to access or display an electronic product."Electronic product system." The processes, equipment, programming SOFTWARE and hardware that: (1) is used to issue electronic products and to administer the use of issued electronic products, including verification of the information contained in a product using a verification system PROCESS and displaying a product holder's profile; and(2) is designed to comply with the most recently applicable standards of the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators and International Organization for Standardization for electronic products and electronic product systems. DEPARTMENT-APPROVED NATIONAL AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS FOR ELECTRONIC PRODUCTS AND ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEMS PUBLISHED IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN.* * *"Full profile." An electronic representation of all data fields included on a physical driver's license or identification card regarding the product holder created by the department.20250HB1970PN3053 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Identification card." A physical identification card or electronic identification card issued by the department under this title that identifies the product holder.* * *" ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard." The interface specifications for the implementation of a driving license in association with a mobile device published by the International Organization for Standardization.* * *"Limited profile." An electronic representation created by the department containing less than all of the data fields printed or otherwise displayed on an individual's product.* * *"Physical driver's license." A product DRIVER'S LICENSE issued under this title in a physical format, such as paper or plastic, that identifies the individual to whom the card was issued."Physical identification card." A product AN IDENTIFICATION CARD issued under this title in a physical format, such as paper or plastic, that identifies the individual to whom the card was issued.* * *"Product." A driver's license or an identification card issued under this title."Product holder." An individual to whom a product has been issued.* * *"REAL ID Act of 2005." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 2 of the act of May 26, 2017 (P.L.6, 20250HB1970PN3053 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.3), known as the Pennsylvania REAL ID Compliance Act. * * *"Third-party electronic product system." An electronic product system that is not maintained by the department or an agent acting on behalf of the department. The term includes, without limitation, an electronic wallet."THIRD-PARTY ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM OPERATOR." A PERSON THAT MAINTAINS OR OFFERS A THIRD-PARTY ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM.* * *"Verification process." A method of authenticating an electronic product through the use of secure encrypted communication."Verifier." A person that seeks to confirm information about an electronic product holder via the department's verification process and the electronic product's data fields. The term does not include an employee of a criminal justice agency as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 9102 (relating to definitions) while in the performance of the employee's duties.* * *Section 2. Section 1510 of Title 75 is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.* * *(k) Electronic driver's license.--The department may issue an electronic driver's license to an individual who holds a physical driver's license issued under this title that complies MAY OR MAY NOT COMPLY with the REAL ID Act of 2005. The department may SHALL create an electronic product system that a licensee may access via an electronic product device TO DISPLAY 20250HB1970PN3053 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSE ON THE DEVICE . (l) Electronic identification card.--The department may issue an electronic identification card to an individual who holds a physical identification card issued under this title which complies MAY OR MAY NOT COMPLY with the REAL ID Act of 2005. The department may SHALL create an electronic product system that an identification card holder may access via an electronic product device . TO DISPLAY THE ELECTRONIC IDENTIFICATION CARD ON THE DEVICE. (m) Regulations regarding electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards.--The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to issue and verify electronic products issued by the department under this title or by other government entities. COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(n) Electronic products.--(1) The department may issue only one TYPE OF electronic product to an individual. The data fields in the electronic product shall match the data fields held by the department for the product holder at the time the electronic product is issued.(2) Changes and updates to data fields held by the department shall be reflected in the data fields in the electronic product. The department shall update the data fields of electronic products when the department updates the records of holders of electronic products, but not later than 30 days of updating the records. An electronic product device shall permit the update of the data fields of the electronic product with the department periodically to determine the operating system and application compliance and to update the 20250HB1970PN3053 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 data fields on the electronic product. TO ENSURE THAT THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT IS UP TO DATE AND VALID.(3) The department shall include an attribute on a driver's record indicating the presence of a physical, cognitive or communication impairment, if applicable. The department shall establish a procedure by which a driver may request the inclusion of the designation on the driver's official driving record.(o) Third-party electronic product systems.--The department may issue electronic products through a third-party electronic product system owned, operated or controlled by a third party. Prior to issuing electronic products through a third-party electronic product system, the department must enter into an agreement with the third party to protect the confidentiality of the information contained in records held by the department or the data fields of electronic credentials as required by this title.(O) THIRD-PARTY ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE ELECTRONIC PRODUCTS THROUGH A THIRD-PARTY ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM OPERATOR. A THIRD-PARTY ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM OPERATOR:(1) SHALL LIMIT THE COLLECTION OF PERSONAL DATA OR DATA FIELD INFORMATION, WHETHER AS A REQUIRED CONDITION OF USE OF THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM OR ON THE BASIS OF USER CONSENT, TO ONLY DATA THAT IS ADEQUATE, RELEVANT AND NECESSARY FOR THE OPERATION OF THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM.(2) SHALL DISCLOSE ALL COLLECTION AND COLLECTION JUSTIFICATION TO AN APPLICANT FOR AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT OR AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT HOLDER.(3) SHALL PERMIT AN APPLICANT FOR AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT 20250HB1970PN3053 - 7 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OR AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT HOLDER TO OPT OUT OF ANY DATA COLLECTION AND INFORM THE APPLICANT OR ELECTRONIC PRODUCT HOLDER OF HOW THE APPLICANT'S OR ELECTRONIC PRODUCT HOLDER'S CHOICE TO OPT OUT WILL IMPACT THE FUNCTIONALITY OF THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM.(4) SHALL TREAT ALL PERSONAL DATA OR DATA FIELD INFORMATION COLLECTED, WHETHER AS A REQUIRED CONDITION OF USE OF THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM OR ON THE BASIS OF USER CONSENT, AS PERSONAL INFORMATION AS DEFINED UNDER SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 22, 2005 (P.L.474, NO.94), KNOWN AS THE BREACH OF PERSONAL INFORMATION NOTIFICATION ACT, AND SHALL BE CONSIDERED AN ENTITY THAT MAINTAINS, STORES OR MANAGES COMPUTERIZED DATA THAT INCLUDES PERSONAL INFORMATION UNDER THE BREACH OF PERSONAL INFORMATION NOTIFICATION ACT.(5) SHALL REPORT TO THE DATA SUBJECT UPON REQUEST ALL USES OF PERSONAL DATA OR DATA FIELD INFORMATION COLLECTED, WHETHER AS A REQUIRED CONDITION OF USE OF THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM OR ON THE BASIS OF USER CONSENT.(6) MAY NOT ACCESS OR CENTRALLY STORE INFORMATION REGARDING PRESENTMENT OF AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT.(7) MAY ACCESS AND CENTRALLY STORE ONLY THE MINIMUM NECESSARY INFORMATION, FOR THE MINIMUM NECESSARY DURATION OF TIME, TO ENABLE PRODUCT USE.(P) AGREEMENT FOR THIRD-PARTY ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM.--(1) A CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT FOR THE PROCUREMENT, LICENSING, ACCESS OR USE OF SOFTWARE OR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ENTERED INTO BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR A THIRD-PARTY ELECTRONIC PRODUCT SYSTEM MAY NOT INCLUDE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS:(I) REQUIRE THE COMMONWEALTH OR THE DEPARTMENT TO 20250HB1970PN3053 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INDEMNIFY, DEFEND OR HOLD HARMLESS ANY PARTY FROM CLAIMS ARISING UNDER THIS SECTION.(II) SUBJECT THE COMMONWEALTH OR THE DEPARTMENT TO BINDING ARBITRATION OR ANY OTHER BINDING EXTRAJUDICIAL DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS.(III) DESIGNATE A VENUE FOR ANY LEGAL ACTION OR DISPUTE AGAINST THE COMMONWEALTH OR THE DEPARTMENT OUTSIDE THE COURTS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH OR A FEDERAL COURT IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(IV) WAIVE ANY CLAIM OR DEFENSE THAT THE FORUM IS NOT CONVENIENT OR PROPER.(V) REQUIRE THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT TO BE GOVERNED BY THE LAWS OF A JURISDICTION OTHER THAN THIS COMMONWEALTH OR FEDERAL LAW.(2) A PROVISION CONTAINED IN A CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE AND THE REMAINDER OF THE AGREEMENT SHALL REMAIN VALID AND ENFORCEABLE AS IF THE VOID TERM HAD NOT BEEN INCLUDED.(p) (Q) Messenger and agent services.--A messenger or agent service authorized under Chapter 75 (relating to messenger service) shall require a physical driver's license or physical identification card when transferring ownership of a vehicle or issuing a registration plate or temporary registration plate if a form of identification is required under this title.(q) (R) Electronic driver's license and electronic identification card verification process .-- (1) The department shall develop CREATE a verification process that operates when the department issues electronic products. IS CONSISTENT WITH NATIONAL AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND PUBLISHED IN THE 20250HB1970PN3053 - 9 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN.(2) An individual who is issued an electronic product may give consent to a verifier to verify information about the product holder via the department's APPROVED verification process . (3) The product holder shall determine which data fields are available to the verifier via the product holder's electronic product device. The product holder may make either a full profile, a limited profile or no data fields available to the verifier.(4) If there is a discrepancy between the information on an individual's physical driver's license or physical identification card and the information in a verification from the department via the verification process, IN AN ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSE OR ELECTRONIC IDENTIFICATION CARD VERIFICATION PROCESS, the information from the verification process shall be considered the accurate and current information.(5) The department may enter into agreements with other government entities COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES that issue electronic credentials to allow for verification of those credentials through the department's verification process . The department may enter into agreements with other government entities COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES and jurisdictions that operate a similar verification process for the purpose of verifying electronic products issued under this title . AND OTHER APPLICABLE STATUTES.(6) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN EMPLOYEE OF A CRIMINAL JUSTICE AGENCY AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 9102 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) MAY ACCESS THE 20250HB1970PN3053 - 10 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VERIFICATION PROCESS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES WHILE IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE EMPLOYEE'S OFFICIAL DUTIES AND RETAIN THAT INFORMATION AS NECESSARY IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW.(r) (S) Verification process.-- (1) A verifier shall authenticate an electronic product in accordance with applicable American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators Standards prior to acceptance of the electronic product. REGULATIONS. (2) Electronic product data shall be subject to all jurisdictional data security and privacy protection laws and regulations.(3) A verifier shall only request electronic product data elements FIELDS that are necessary to complete the transaction for which that data is being requested.(s) Privacy and tracking.--A verifier may only retain electronic product data elements for which the verifier explicitly obtained consent from the electronic product holder. A verifier must inform the electronic product holder of the use and retention period of the electronic data elements.(T) PRIVACY AND TRACKING.--(1) A VERIFIER SHALL ONLY RETAIN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT DATA FIELDS FOR THE MINIMUM NECESSARY TIME, OR THE TIME ALLOWED UNDER LAW, AND ONLY WITH THE USER'S CONSENT.(2) IN ALL CASES, VERIFIERS MAY NOT SELL OR SHARE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT DATA FIELDS UNLESS REQUIRED BY LAW AND ONLY WITH A USER'S CONSENT.(3) VERIFIERS SHALL BE SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (O)(1), (2), (3), (4) AND (5).(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, ALL 20250HB1970PN3053 - 11 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PERSONAL DATA OR DATA FIELD INFORMATION COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE DEEMED A PUBLIC RECORD UNDER THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 14, 2008 (P.L.6, NO.3), KNOWN AS THE RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW. THE RESTRICTIONS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE DEEMED TO PRECLUDE A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION FROM ISSUING AN ORDER DIRECTING THAT THE INFORMATION BE PROVIDED TO LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICIALS IF THE INFORMATION IS REASONABLY DESCRIBED AND IS REQUESTED SOLELY IN CONNECTION WITH A CRIMINAL LAW ENFORCEMENT ACTION.(t) (U) Reports to General Assembly.--Reports to the General Assembly shall be in accordance with the following:(1) Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall present an initial report to the individuals listed under paragraph (3) providing details on estimated costs associated with the implementation and maintenance of electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards. The report shall also include all estimated initial and recurring costs to establish and maintain a process that allows individuals to apply for an electronic driver's license or electronic identification card.(2) Except for the year the initial report is presented, the department shall submit an annual report to the individuals listed under paragraph (3) no later than July 1 of each year, providing details on costs incurred by the department under this section. At a minimum, the report shall include:(i) The cost to the department to issue electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards.(ii) The total number of electronic driver's 20250HB1970PN3053 - 12 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licenses and electronic identification cards applied for.(iii) The total number of electronic driver's licenses and electronic identification cards issued.(3) The reports required under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be submitted to the following individuals:(i) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives. (iii) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate.(iv) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(v) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE INDIVIDUALS LISTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) NO LATER THAN JULY 1 OF EACH YEAR, PROVIDING DETAILS ON COSTS INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION. AT A MINIMUM, THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:(I) THE COST TO THE DEPARTMENT TO ISSUE ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSES AND ELECTRONIC IDENTIFICATION CARDS.(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSES AND ELECTRONIC IDENTIFICATION CARDS APPLIED FOR.(III) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSES AND ELECTRONIC IDENTIFICATION CARDS ISSUED.(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS:(I) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.20250HB1970PN3053 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(V) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS DESCRIBING THE PURPOSE OF AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT, HOW AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT WORKS, HOW TO APPLY FOR AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION AT THE DEPARTMENT'S DISCRETION WHICH MAY INCLUDE WRITTEN, ELECTRONIC OR VIDEO MATERIALS.Section 3. Section 1511 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 1511. Carrying and exhibiting driver's license on demand.(a) General rule.--Every licensee shall possess [a] THE physical driver's license issued to the licensee at all times when driving a motor vehicle and shall exhibit [the] a physical driver's license upon demand by a police officer, and when requested by the police officer the licensee shall write the licensee's name in the presence of the officer in order to provide identity.(b) Production to avoid penalty.--No person shall be convicted of violating this section or section 1501(a) (relating to drivers required to be licensed) if the person:(1) produces at the headquarters of the police officer who demanded to see the person's license, within 15 days of the demand, a driver's license valid in this Commonwealth at the time of the demand; or(2) if a citation has been filed, produces at the office of the issuing authority, within 15 days of the filing of the citation, a driver's license valid in this Commonwealth on the date of the citation.(c) Surrender of electronic product device not required.--A statute or regulation that requires an individual to surrender a 20250HB1970PN3053 - 14 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 driver's license or identification card to law enforcement shall not apply to an electronic product device. If an individual chooses to surrender an electronic product device to a law enforcement officer who inadvertently causes damage to the electronic device, the law enforcement officer shall not be liable for the damage to the electronic product device.(d) Privacy of information on electronic product device.--(1) If a licensee exhibits an electronic driver's license upon demand by a police officer under this section, the police officer may review only the full profile of the product holder's electronic driver's license via the electronic product device.(2) If the police officer inadvertently reviews information on the electronic product device in addition to the licensee's full profile, the inadvertently reviewed information may not be used as evidence in a civil or criminal trial.(D) PRIVACY OF INFORMATION ON ELECTRONIC PRODUCT DEVICE.-- IF A LICENSEE EXHIBITS AN ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSE UPON DEMAND BY A POLICE OFFICER UNDER THIS SECTION:(1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY REVIEW ONLY THE FULL PROFILE OF THE PRODUCT HOLDER'S ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSE VIA THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT DEVICE.(2) A POLICE OFFICER SHALL PROMPTLY RETURN THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT DEVICE TO THE LICENSEE ONCE THE POLICE OFFICER HAS HAD AN OPPORTUNITY TO VERIFY THE IDENTITY AND DRIVER'S LICENSE INFORMATION AND STATUS OF THE LICENSEE.(3) EXCEPT WHERE RETENTION IS AUTHORIZED BY LAW, THE POLICE OFFICER SHALL PROMPTLY RETURN THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT DEVICE TO THE LICENSEE UPON REQUEST BY THE LICENSEE.20250HB1970PN3053 - 15 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) THE EXHIBITION OF AN ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSE BY A LICENSEE MAY NOT SERVE AS CONSENT FOR A POLICE OFFICER TO SEARCH OR ACCESS ANY OTHER DATA OR APPLICATION ON THE ELECTRONIC PRODUCT DEVICE.(e) Immunity.--If a licensee or identification card holder chooses to exhibit an electronic product or an electronic product device under this title, the individual viewing the electronic product in good faith for a purpose under this title OR FEDERAL OR STATE STATUTE OR REGULATION shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that arises from the licensee's OR IDENTIFICATION CARD HOLDER'S choice, including, but not limited to:(1) the inadvertent viewing of materials on the electronic product device other than the electronic product;(2) the inadvertent deletion of information from the electronic product device;(3) the inadvertent interception of a communication while in possession of the electronic product device; or(4) any INADVERTENT breakage that may occur to the electronic product device. (F) REGULATIONS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROMULGATE REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THAT ALL ELECTRONIC PRODUCTS COMPLY WITH NATIONAL AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1970PN3053 - 16 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324